Utah statutes.
34-28-10.   Employers' records -- Inspection by division.
(1) (a)  Every employer shall keep a true and accurate record of time worked
and wages paid each pay period to each employee who is employed on an hourly
or a daily basis in the form required by the commission rules.
(b)  The employer shall keep the records on file for at least one year after
the entry of the record.
(2)  The director of the division or the director's designee may enter any
place of employment during business hours to inspect the records and to ensure
compliance with this section.
(3)  Any effort of any employer to obstruct the commission in the performance
of its duties is considered to be a violation of this chapter and may be
punished as any other violation of this chapter.
